Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB654.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 51 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a chapter to read:CHAPTER 100VETERANS MENTAL HEALTH SERVICES PROGRAMSec.10001. Scope of chapter.10002. Definitions.10003. Veterans Mental Health Services Program.§ 10001. Scope of chapter.This chapter relates to providing mental health care for veterans who have exhausted their Federal benefits or are in acute crisis.1234567891011121314151617 § 10002. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Acute crisis." When an individual is in need of immediate mental health care to protect the safety and well-being of the individual or the public."Department." The Department of Military and Veterans Affairs of the Commonwealth."Eligible veteran." An individual who served in the United States Armed Forces, including a reserve component or the National Guard, and who meets the requirements under section 10003(e) (relating to Veterans Mental Health Services Program) . "Health care provider." As defined in 45 CFR 160.103 (relating to definitions) as of the effective date of this section."Participating health care provider." A health care provider who provides mental health services to veterans under the program."Program." The Veterans Mental Health Services Program established under section 10003(a)."Treatment." As defined in 45 CFR 164.501 (relating to definitions)."Veterans Affairs." The United States Department of Veterans Affairs.§ 10003. Veterans Mental Health Services Program.(a) Establishment.--The Veterans Mental Health Services Program is established within the department to provide mental health care to veterans.(b) Reimbursement.--The department shall reimburse 20250SB0654PN0665 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 participating health care providers. The following shall apply:(1) An eligible veteran may receive five reimbursed sessions per year.(2) The department may grant an eligible veteran additional sessions if determined by the health care provider that the sessions are necessary and the department has:(i) the resources necessary to reimburse the health care provider; and(ii) approved the additional sessions before they occur.(c) Program guidelines.--In consultation with the Department of Human Services, the department shall determine program guidelines for eligible veterans and health care providers.(d) List of participating providers.--The department shall publish on the department's publicly accessible Internet website a list of participating health care providers.(e) Eligibility requirements.--In order to be eligible to participate in the program, the following must apply to the veteran:(1) The veteran was discharged or released from service under conditions other than dishonorable.(2) Either of the following:(i) The veteran's benefits related to mental health services provided by Veterans Affairs have been exhausted for the year in which the veteran seeks to participate in the program.(ii) The veteran is in acute crisis.(f) Declaration form.--The department shall prescribe and provide participating health care providers with a form on which the eligible veteran shall declare that the eligible veteran has 20250SB0654PN0665 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 complied with the requirement under subsection (e)(2)(i), if applicable.(g) Treatment requirements.--Prior to treatment, an eligible veteran shall provide the participating health care provider with:(1) A valid identification card that:(i) clearly indicates that the individual is a veteran of the United States Armed Forces; and(ii) includes a photo of the veteran.(2) The completed form required under subsection (f).(h) Report.--(1) No later than December 31 of each year, the department shall issue a report regarding the program, including the number of:(i) eligible veterans participating in the program per county;(ii) health care providers participating in the program per county; and(iii) mental health care sessions provided by the program per county.(2) The report under paragraph (1) shall be submitted to the following:(i) The President pro tempore of the Senate.(ii) The Speaker of the House of Representatives.(iii) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Appropriations Committee of the Senate.(iv) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Appropriations Committee of the House of Representatives.(v) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Health and Human Services Committee of the Senate.20250SB0654PN0665 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (vi) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Human Services Committee of the House of Representatives.(vii) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Veterans Affairs and Emergency Preparedness Committee of the Senate.(viii) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Veterans Affairs and Emergency Preparedness Committee of the House of Representatives.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 120 days.20250SB0654PN0665 - 5 - 123456789